Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.080

Chapters of RCW not affected.

Nothing in this chapter affects the provisions of chapters 19.27A, 19.28, 43.22, 70.77, 70.79, 70.87, 43.44, 18.20, 18.46, 18.51, 28A.305, 70.41, 70.62, 70.75, 70.108, 71.12, 74.15, 70A.15, 76.04, 70A.355 RCW, or RCW 28A.195.010, or grants rights to duplicate the authorities provided under chapters 70A.15 or 76.04 RCW.

[ 2021 c 65 s 17; 2003 c 291 s 3; 1990 c 33 s 555; 1989 c 346 s 19; 1975 1st ex.s. c 282 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 96 s 8.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Intent—Finding—2003 c 291: See note following RCW 19.27.031.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Captions—Severability—Effective date—1989 c 346: See RCW 70A.355.900 through 70A.355.902.